Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2442.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 7.1. Temporary operating license.(a) Authorization to issue a temporary operating license.--Upon notification by an applicant for a retail food facility license under 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 57 Subch. A (relating to retail food facility safety) that the applicant has submitted a permit application for a public water system to the department, the Department of Agriculture shall issue a temporary operating 123456789101112131415161718 license to the applicant if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The applicant has provided the Department of Agriculture with proof of submission of a complete application for a permit for a public water system to the department.(2) The applicant demonstrates to the Department of Agriculture, through certified laboratory testing, that the public water system is in compliance with the standards established under the Federal act . (b) Resubmission.--If the permit for the public water system has not been issued within six months, the applicant shall resubmit to the Department of Agriculture a certified laboratory test demonstrating continued compliance with the Federal act and shall resubmit an additional certified laboratory test for each subsequent six-month period during which the permit remains unissued. Failure to resubmit a certified laboratory test as required under this subsection shall result in automatic revocation of the temporary operating license.(c) Duration.--A temporary operating license issued under this section shall:(1) Remain valid only while the permit application for the public water system is pending before the department.(2) Automatically expire upon:(i) issuance of a permit for the public water system by the department; or(ii) denial of the permit application.(d) New temporary operating license.--(1) If the temporary operating license expires due to a denial of the permit application for the public water system, 20260HB2442PN3252 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an applicant for a retail food facility license under 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 57 Subch. A may request a new temporary operating license from the Department of Agriculture. The Department of Agriculture shall grant the request if all of the following conditions are met:(i) The applicant has provided the Department of Agriculture with proof of submission of a complete application for a permit for a public water system to the department.(ii) The applicant demonstrates to the Department of Agriculture, through certified laboratory testing, that the public water system is in compliance with the standards established under the Federal act . (2) A temporary operating license issued under this section shall be subject to subsection (c).(e) Revocation.--The Department of Agriculture shall revoke a temporary operating license if the applicant's public water system fails to maintain compliance with the standards established under the Federal act . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2442PN3252 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920